Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB358.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 383 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "algorithmic device":
(a) Means a device that uses one (1) or more algorithms to perform
calculations of data, including data concerning local or statewide rent
amounts being charged to tenants by landlords, for the purpose of advising
a landlord concerning the amount of rent that the landlord may consider
charging a tenant;
(b) Includes a product that incorporates an algorithmic device; and
(c) Does not include a product designed internally and used exclusively by a
landlord or a landlord's affiliates.
(2) A landlord shall not employ, use, or rely upon, or cause another person to
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/29/2025 12:41 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1079
employ, use, or rely upon, an algorithmic device in setting the amount of rent to
be charged to a tenant for the occupancy of a dwelling unit.
(3) A violation of this section shall be deemed an unfair, false, misleading, or
deceptive practice in the conduct of trade or commerce in violation of KRS
367.170.
Section 2. Section 1 of this Act applies to a landlord's calculation of the amount
of rent for a rental agreement executed on or after the effective date of this Act.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/29/2025 12:41 PM Jacketed